Tennessee statutes. Title 44 Animals And Animal Husbandry
Chapter 12

Tennessee Public Livestock Market Charter Act [Repealed]

44-12-101. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§44-12-101 —44-12-111 (Acts 1967, ch. 323, § 1-6; T.C.A., § 44-2401 — 44-2406, §§ 7-9, 11; T.C.A., § 44-2411; Acts 1972, ch. 724, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-2408, Acts 1974, ch. 523, § 1; T.C.A. 44-2409; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(81); T.C.A. 2407; Acts 1980, ch. 767, § 3; Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 15), concerning the “Tennessee Public Livestock Market Charter Act”, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 20, effective June 30, 2010.

44-12-102. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§44-12-101 —44-12-111 (Acts 1967, ch. 323, § 1-6; T.C.A., § 44-2401 — 44-2406, §§ 7-9, 11; T.C.A., § 44-2411; Acts 1972, ch. 724, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-2408, Acts 1974, ch. 523, § 1; T.C.A. 44-2409; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(81); T.C.A. 2407; Acts 1980, ch. 767, § 3; Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 15 concerning the “Tennessee Public Livestock Market Charter Act”, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 20, effective June 30, 2010.

44-12-103. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§44-12-101 -44-12-111 (Acts 1967, ch. 323, § 1-6; T.C.A., § 44-2401 -- 44-2406, §§ 7-9, 11; T.C.A., § 44-2411; Acts 1972, ch. 724, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-2408, Acts 1974, ch. 523, § 1; T.C.A. 44-2409; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(81); T.C.A. 2407; Acts 1980, ch. 767, § 3;Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 15 concerning the “Tennessee Public Livestock Market Charter Act”, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 20, effective June 30, 2010.

44-12-104. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§44-12-101 -44-12-111 (Acts 1967, ch. 323, § 1-6; T.C.A., § 44-2401 -- 44-2406, §§ 7-9, 11; T.C.A., § 44-2411; Acts 1972, ch. 724, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-2408, Acts 1974, ch. 523, § 1; T.C.A. 44-2409; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(81); T.C.A. 2407; Acts 1980, ch. 767, § 3;Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 15 concerning the “Tennessee Public Livestock Market Charter Act”, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 20, effective June 30, 2010.

44-12-105. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§44-12-101 -44-12-111 (Acts 1967, ch. 323, § 1-6; T.C.A., § 44-2401 -- 44-2406, §§ 7-9, 11; T.C.A., § 44-2411; Acts 1972, ch. 724, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-2408, Acts 1974, ch. 523, § 1; T.C.A. 44-2409; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(81); T.C.A. 2407; Acts 1980, ch. 767, § 3;Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 15 concerning the “Tennessee Public Livestock Market Charter Act”, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 20, effective June 30, 2010.

44-12-106. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§44-12-101 —44-12-111 (Acts 1967, ch. 323, § 1-6; T.C.A., § 44-2401 — 44-2406, §§ 7-9, 11; T.C.A., § 44-2411; Acts 1972, ch. 724, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-2408, Acts 1974, ch. 523, § 1; T.C.A. 44-2409; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(81); T.C.A. 2407; Acts 1980, ch. 767, § 3;Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 15 concerning the “Tennessee Public Livestock Market Charter Act”, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 20, effective June 30, 2010.

44-12-107. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§44-12-101 -44-12-111 (Acts 1967, ch. 323, § 1-6; T.C.A., § 44-2401 -- 44-2406, §§ 7-9, 11; T.C.A., § 44-2411; Acts 1972, ch. 724, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-2408, Acts 1974, ch. 523, § 1; T.C.A. 44-2409; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(81); T.C.A. 2407; Acts 1980, ch. 767, § 3;Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 15 concerning the “Tennessee Public Livestock Market Charter Act”, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 20, effective June 30, 2010.

44-12-108. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§44-12-101 -44-12-111 (Acts 1967, ch. 323, § 1-6; T.C.A., § 44-2401 -- 44-2406, §§ 7-9, 11; T.C.A., § 44-2411; Acts 1972, ch. 724, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-2408, Acts 1974, ch. 523, § 1; T.C.A. 44-2409; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(81); T.C.A. 2407; Acts 1980, ch. 767, § 3;Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 15 concerning the “Tennessee Public Livestock Market Charter Act”, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 20, effective June 30, 2010.

44-12-109. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§44-12-101 -44-12-111 (Acts 1967, ch. 323, § 1-6; T.C.A., § 44-2401 -- 44-2406, §§ 7-9, 11; T.C.A., § 44-2411; Acts 1972, ch. 724, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-2408, Acts 1974, ch. 523, § 1; T.C.A. 44-2409; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(81); T.C.A. 2407; Acts 1980, ch. 767, § 3;Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 15 concerning the “Tennessee Public Livestock Market Charter Act”, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 20, effective June 30, 2010.

44-12-110. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§44-12-101 -44-12-111 (Acts 1967, ch. 323, § 1-6; T.C.A., § 44-2401 -- 44-2406, §§ 7-9, 11; T.C.A., § 44-2411; Acts 1972, ch. 724, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-2408, Acts 1974, ch. 523, § 1; T.C.A. 44-2409; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(81); T.C.A. 2407; Acts 1980, ch. 767, § 3;Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 15 concerning the “Tennessee Public Livestock Market Charter Act”, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 20, effective June 30, 2010.

44-12-111. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 12, §§44-12-101 -44-12-111 (Acts 1967, ch. 323, § 1-6; T.C.A., § 44-2401 -- 44-2406, §§ 7-9, 11; T.C.A., § 44-2411; Acts 1972, ch. 724, § 1; T.C.A., § 44-2408, Acts 1974, ch. 523, § 1; T.C.A. 44-2409; Acts 1976, ch. 806, § 1(81); T.C.A. 2407; Acts 1980, ch. 767, § 3;Acts 1988, ch. 1013, § 15 concerning the “Tennessee Public Livestock Market Charter Act”, was repealed by Acts 2010, ch. 717, § 20, effective June 30, 2010.